src-fst-phonology.twolc.md
# The Faroese morphophonological file 

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fao/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 


## Alphabet
Here we declare all symbols.

* **a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å** 
* **á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç** 

* **A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å** 
* **Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð** 


* **a2:a** for invariant a, d.g. vulka2nskur -> vulkanskum
* **g2:g** for invariant g
* **i2:i** for invariant i
* **j2:j** for invariant j
* **t2:t** for invariant, non-deleted t, dráttri pro *drátri
* **v2:v** for invariant v

* **a3:a** a:ø for da3n -> dønum, where normal a:o.

* **%^UUML:0 %^IUML:0 %^eIUML:0 %^ØUML:0** : Umlaut types ,
* **%^W:0 %^JI:0** : Cns changes ,
* **%^EPH:0** : Epenthesis,  ,
* **%^OEA:0** : ø to a

* **%^GDEL:0 %^GGDEL:0 %^GVDEL:0 %^VDEL:0 %^JDEL:0 %^RDEL:0** : Cns deletion triggers,
* **%^AB1:0 %^AB2:0 %^AB3:0 %^AB4:0 %^AB5:0 %^AB6:0 %^AB7:0** : Ablaut series ,
* **%^aAB:0 %^uAB:0** : Ablaut series subcases

* **%[<%]** : Real less than
* **%[>%]** : Real greater than
* **«7** : Real quote mark
* **»7** : Real quote mark
* **« »** : Derivational morpheme borders

## Sets
Here we define some convenient sets.


* **Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å** 
 **á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý ;** 
* **Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;** 
* **Nas = m n ;** 
* **NonNas = b c d f g h j k l p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;** 
* **Dummy = %^UUML %^IUML %^eIUML %^W %^EPH %^JI %^OEA** 
  **%^EDH %^VSH %^GDEL %^GGDEL %^GVDEL %^VDEL %^JDEL** 
 **%^RDEL %^EIO %^OA %^WVV %^NGKK %^AB1 %^AB2 %^AB3** 
 **%^AB4 %^AB5 %^AB6 %^AB7 %^aAB %^uAB %^PASS %> ;** 
* **Special = %^UUML %^IUML %^W %^EPH %^JI %^OEA %^GDEL %^GGDEL** 
 **%^GVDEL %^VDEL %^JDEL %^RDEL ;** 
Forgot why these are special...


# Rules
These are the rules. After each rule (or rather: after many of the rules) there are test cases that are there to test whether the rules work.



## Verschärfung

Rule: **Deleting g** 
* Deleting g in gv Verschärfung I
* Deleting first g in ggj Genitive I
* Deleting second g in ggj Genitive II
* Deleting g in sting:stakst


* *sting^NGKK^aAB>st*
* *stak0000st*



Rule: **ng to kk Part 1** changes n to k in ng:kk before ^NGKK trigger

Rule: **ng to kk Part 2** changes g to k in ng:kk before ^NGKK trigger



Rule: **Deleting v in gv sequences** Verschärverung II gives v:0 for gv:00 before ^GVDEL and in some other contexts

**Verschärfung tests:***

* *bógv^IUML>i*
* *bøg000i*
* *flúgv^IUML^VDEL*
* *flýg000*
* *flúgv^VSH^VDEL>u*
* *flug0000u*
* *búgv^GVDEL>s*
* *bú0000s*
* *bógv^VDEL>s*
* *bóg000s*
* *skógv^GVDEL>m*
* *skó0000m*
* *skýggj^GGDEL>s*
* *ský00000s*
* *kríggj^GDEL>s*
* *kríg0000s*
* *sjógv^GDEL>ar*
* *sjó0v00ar*

Rule: **Deleting r in Genitive of ur stems** 

* *brúður^EPH^RDEL>ar*
* *brúð00000ar*


Rule: **Deleting m in um%>num ** 

**Tests:**

* *ris>um>num*
* *ris0u00num*
* *skógv^GVDEL>m>num*
* *skó000000num*



Rule: **Deleting Double Consonant in Front of Consonant** 

The preceeding rule is fishy - the test cases below don't fit the context
requirements, and the >s# in the right context seems to indicate passive.
The rule conflicts with the "Cns Deletion in front of Pass" rule at the
end of the file - but only when using the Xerox tools! XXX - please have a look!

**Tests:**

* *hjall>s*
* *hjal00s*
* *rygg>s*
* *ryg00s*
* *hjall>ar*
* *hjall0ar*




* *all>t*
* *al00t*





## Verbal Sandhi rules

Rule: **Geminate Assimilation in Past Tense d** 

Rule: **Geminate Assimilation in Past Tense t** 

**Tests:**
* *send>di*
* *sen00di*
* *hirð>di*
* *hir00di*
* *sett>ti*
* *set00ti*



Rule: **ð Assimilation in Front of Dental Past Suffix -d(i)** 

* *leið>di*
* *leid0di*


**Tests:**

* *leið>di*
* *leid0di*
* *greið>di*
* *greid0di*
* *ryð^WVV>di*
* *rud00di*


Rule: **Deleting Double Consonant in Front of Epenthesis mark** 



**Tests:**

* *summar^EPH>i*
* *sum00r00i*
* *himmal^EPH^UUML>um*
* *him00l000um*


Rule: **Deleting stem-final s in s genitive** 

**Tests:**

* *primus>s*
* *primus00*
* *primus>s*
* *primus00*
* *grís>s*
* *grís00*


Rule: **Double ð Deletion** 


Rule: **ð Assimilation in Front of Supine Suffix -t** 

**Tests:**

* *leið>t*
* *leit0t*

Rule: **Adjusting Dental Past Suffix -d(i)** 

**Tests:**

* *keyp>di*
* *keyp0ti*
* *merk>di*
* *merk0ti*

## Adjectival sandhi rules

Rule: **Adjective neuter after nlr 1** 

Rule: **Adjective neuter after nlr 2** 

**Tests:**

* *mikil^EPH>t*
* *miki000ð*
* *gamal^EPH>t*
* *gamal00t*

Rule: **t Deletion in Neuter** 



j rules

Rule: **Deleting j** 

**Tests:**

* *kríggj^GDEL>num*
* *kríg0000num*
* *beiggj^JI>i*
* *beigg000i*
* *verkj^JDEL>ur*
* *verk000ur*
* *heyggj>i*
* *heygg00i*


Rule: **Realising j in front of vowels** 

**Tests:**

* *hylj2>ar*
* *hylj0ar*




Vowel rules  


Rule: **Realising i2 as i** 

**Tests:**


###  Epenthetic vowel rules

Rule: **Epenthetic deletion** 

**Tests:**

* *økur^EPH^UUML>um*
* *øk0r000um*
* *lykil^EPH>an*
* *lyk0l00an*
* *aftan^EPH>*
* *aftan00*
* *vakin^EPH>ir*
* *vak0n00ir*



Rule: **U-umlaut of Epenthetic vowel** 

**Tests:**

* *gamal^EPH^UUML*
* *gomul00*
* *gamal^EPH^UUML>u*
* *goml000u*


### Umlaut rules

Rule: **U-umlaut in Front of Nasal** 

* *tank^UUML*
* *tonk0*

**Tests:**

* *band^UUML*
* *bond00*
* *hamar^EPH^UUML>um*
* *hom0r000um*

Rule: **General U-umlaut** 

**Tests:**

* *dag^UUML>um*
* *døg00um*
* *sag^UUML>a*
* *søg00a*
* *all^UUML>*
* *øll00*


Rule: **U-umlaut for akur** 

**Tests:**

* *akur^EPH^UUML>um*
* *øk0r000um*

Rule: **I-umlaut** 

**Tests:**

* *dag^IUML>i*
* *deg00i*
* *son^IUML>i*
* *syn00i*
* *bógv^IUML>i*
* *bøg000i*
* *ung^IUMLr>i*
* *yng0r0i*
* *fjørð^IUML>i*
* *f0irð00i*



Rule: **eI-umlaut** for o:e, á:e, i:e

Rule: **I-umlaut for bróðir ** 


Rule: **Inverted U-umlaut from ø** 

**Tests:**

* *fløtt^OEAa*
* *flatt0a*

Rule: **Inverted U-umlaut from o** 

**Tests:**

* *fonn^OA>ar*
* *fann00ar*


Rule: **o/ei-Umlaut I** 

Rule: **o/ei-Umlaut II** 

**Tests:**

* *dreing^EIO>i*
* *dro0ng00i*







### Vowel deletion rules

Rule: **Vowel deletion in front of na** 








### Verbal vowel alternation rules

Rule: **Stem vowel change in Weak Verbs** 

**Tests:**

* *flek^WVV>t*
* *flak00t*
* *flek^WVV>t*
* *flak00t*
* *vel^WVV>di*
* *val00di*


Rule: **Stem Vowel Shortening in Supine and Participle** 

**Tests:**

* *bít^VSHin>a*
* *bit00n>a*




Rule: **Past tense singular diphthongs I** 

Rule: **Past tense singular diphthongs II** 

**Tests:**

* *b0ít^AB1*
* *beit0*


Rule: **Past tense singular monophthongs** 

**Tests:**

* *gev^AB3*
* *gav0*

Rule: **Past tense plural monophthongs** 


Rule: **Past tense plural monophthongs to a** 



Rule: **Supine u** 


Rule: **Supine o** 


Rule: **Supine i** 


Rule: **Present tense ý** 




### Adjectival Sandhi rule

Rule: **Vowel shortening in Neuter** 

**Tests:**

* *góð>t*
* *got0t*
* *skjót>t*
* *skjót0t*


## Other rules

### Morphological passive rules

Rule: **u in ur Deletion in front of Pass** 

Rule: **r Deletion in front of Pass** 

Rule: **ð Deletion in front of Pass** 



* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/phonology.twolc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fao/blob/main/../src/fst/phonology.twolc)</small>
